Florida, session 2026, SB1060.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 30 31 Section 1.âSection 381.994, Florida Statutes, is created to 32 read: 33 381.994âNeurofibromatosis Disease Grant Program.â 34 (1)(a)âThere is created within the Department of Health the 35 Neurofibromatosis Disease Grant Program. The purpose of the 36 program is to advance the progress of research and cures for 37 neurofibromatosis by awarding grants through a competitive, 38 peer-reviewed process. 39 (b)âSubject to an annual recurring appropriation of $5 40 million by the Legislature, the program shall award grants for 41 scientific and clinical research to further the search for new 42 diagnostics, treatments, and cures for neurofibromatosis. 43 (2)(a)âApplications for grants for neurofibromatosis 44 disease research may be submitted by any university or 45 established research institute in this state. All qualified 46 investigators in this state, regardless of institutional 47 affiliation, shall have equal access and opportunity to compete 48 for the research funding. Preference may be given to grant 49 proposals that foster collaboration among institutions, 50 researchers, and community practitioners, as such proposals 51 support the advancement of treatments and cures of 52 neurofibromatosis through basic or applied research. Grants 53 shall be awarded by the department, after consultation with the 54 Rare Disease Advisory Council under s. 381.99, on the basis of 55 scientific merit, as determined by the competitive, peer 56 reviewed process to ensure objectivity, consistency, and high 57 quality. The following types of applications may be considered 58 for funding: 59 1.âInvestigator-initiated research grants. 60 2.âInstitutional research grants. 61 3.âCollaborative research grants, including those that 62 advance the finding of treatment and cures through basic or 63 applied research. 64 (b)âTo ensure appropriate and fair evaluation of grant 65 applications based on scientific merit, the department shall 66 appoint peer review panels of independent, scientifically 67 qualified individuals to review the scientific merit of each 68 proposal and establish its priority score. The priority scores 69 shall be forwarded to the council and must be considered in 70 determining which proposals are recommended for funding. 71 (3)âFor purposes of performing their duties under this 72 section, the Rare Disease Advisory Council and the peer review 73 panels shall establish and follow rigorous guidelines for 74 ethical conduct and adhere to a strict policy with regard to 75 conflicts of interest. A member of the council or panel may not 76 participate in any discussion or decision of the council or 77 panel with respect to a research proposal by any firm, entity, 78 or agency with which the member is associated as a member of the 79 governing body or as an employee or with which the member has 80 entered into a contractual arrangement. 81 (4)âNotwithstanding s. 216.301 and pursuant to s. 216.351, 82 the balance of any appropriation from the General Revenue Fund 83 for the Neurofibromatosis Disease Grant Program which is not 84 disbursed but is obligated pursuant to contract or committed to 85 be expended by June 30 of the fiscal year in which the funds are 86 appropriated may be carried forward for up to 5 years after the 87 effective date of the original appropriation. 88 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.